Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 4

Diving Safety

69-9-401. Display, use and illumination of divers-down flags.

All divers shall prominently display a divers-down flag in the area in which they are diving when diving in an area other than one customarily used for swimming only.

Divers shall not display a divers-down flag any longer than thirty (30) minutes before and after the dive.

Divers shall surface within fifty feet (50') of the divers-down flag.

When diving after dusk, divers shall illuminate the divers-down flag to make it visible from at least three hundred feet (300').

No one shall use a divers-down flag to stop, limit, or otherwise affect the flow of water traffic.

Violations of this section shall be punished as follows:

First offense, a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

Second offense, a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00); and

Third offense, a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and up to six (6) months imprisonment.

Acts 1984, ch. 732, § 2; T.C.A. §69-10-401.

69-9-402. Location, measurements and illumination of divers-down flags.

Any boats used as diver stations, diver support boats, or diver supply boats shall display the divers-down flag from their mast or flag staff during the dive. The divers-down flags shall be no smaller than twenty inches (20") by twenty-four inches (24"). Divers not associated with the boats shall display a divers-down flag no smaller than twelve inches (12") by twelve inches (12").

After dark, divers shall illuminate divers-down flags to make them visible from at least three hundred feet (300').

At all times such divers-down flags shall be visible from three hundred sixty degrees (360°).

This section shall apply only to waterways customarily used by boat traffic.

Violations of this section shall be punished as follows:

First offense, a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

Second offense, a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00); and

Third offense, a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

Acts 1984, ch. 732, § 2; T.C.A. §69-10-402; Acts 2007, ch. 185, §§ 16, 17.

Cross-References. Divers-down flags, definition, §69-9-204.

69-9-403. Restricted and no-wake zones.

No boat shall come any closer than fifty feet (50') to any divers-down flag and shall treat the area within two hundred feet (200') of a divers-down flag as a no wake zone.

This section shall not apply to a boat used as a diver station, diver support, or diver supply boat.

Violations of this section shall be punished in accordance with § 69-9-219(b).

Acts 1984, ch. 732, § 2; T.C.A. §69-10-403.

69-9-404. International code flag Alpha.

The international code flag Alpha shall be used in the manner set out in § 69-9-402 by boats sending air or other gases to a diver through an air hose. Such use shall be in addition to any other coast guard approved use of this flag.

The divers-down flag shall not be used in lieu of the Alpha flag to indicate lack of maneuverability.

Whether or not the Alpha flag is being flown, the divers-down flag must be used to mark the location of divers.

Acts 1984, ch. 732, § 2; T.C.A. §69-10-404.

69-9-405. When international rules govern.

In the event that this part is inconsistent with the international rules of navigation, the international rules of navigation shall govern the inconsistency, but the other provisions of this part shall remain in force.

Acts 1984, ch. 732, § 2; T.C.A. §69-10-405.